Mississippi, session 2026, HB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  At least once every two (2) years, the Joint Legislative PEER Committee shall review and evaluate the performance outcomes of subcontracts and subgrants of TANF funds awarded by the Department of Human Services, to examine how the subcontractors, subgrantees and lower-tier subrecipients of those funds expended the funds and determine whether those expenditures met the requirements or goals for the use of those funds.  The committee shall prepare a report of its findings and evaluations and submit the report to the members of the Legislature, and the first report shall be prepared and submitted not later than February 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.